Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2239.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6734HH (2) 91 ss/ns H.F. 2239 Section 1. Section 43.97, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 3. Elect delegates to the next ensuing regular state 3 convention and to all district conventions of that year upon 4 such ratio of representation as may be determined by the party 5 organization for the state, district or districts of the state, 6 as the case may be. Delegates to district conventions need not 7 be selected in the absence of any apparent reason therefor. 8 Delegates shall be persons who are or will by the date of the 9 next general election become eligible electors and who are 10 residents of the county. 11 Sec. 2. Section 43.102, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, 12 is amended to read as follows: 13 Each political party may shall hold a congressional district 14 convention upon the call of the state party chairperson to do 15 all of the following : 16 Sec. 3. Section 43.102, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 17 to read as follows: 18 3. Transact such other business as required by law, or as 19 required or permitted by the partyâs state constitution or 20 bylaws, or the rules of the convention. 21 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 43.105 District platform and bylaws. 22 1. Each congressional district convention held by each 23 political party pursuant to section 43.102 shall adopt a 24 district platform, a copy of which shall be transmitted to the 25 partyâs state central committee for consideration during the 26 adoption of the state partyâs platform pursuant to section 27 43.111, subsection 1. 28 2. Beginning in the year 2027, there shall be established 29 at or prior to each political partyâs district convention a 30 district central committee composed of the chair and co-chair 31 of each county central committee in the district. The district 32 central committee shall elect a chair, co-chair, secretary, 33 and such other officers as the district central committee may 34 determine. The term of office of an officer begins at the 35 -1- LSB 6734HH (2) 91 ss/ns 1/ 3 H.F. 2239 time specified by the state partyâs constitution or bylaws 1 and continues for two years and until the officerâs successor 2 is elected and qualified, unless the officer dies, resigns, 3 or is sooner removed by the district central committee for 4 inattention to duty or incompetency. 5 3. Each district central committee shall enact bylaws 6 to govern the committeeâs operation. A copy of the bylaws 7 shall be kept on file at the office of the state commissioner. 8 Amendments to a district central committeeâs bylaws shall upon 9 adoption be filed in the same manner as the original document. 10 4. Each district central committee may organize at pleasure 11 for political work as is usual and customary with such 12 committees and provide for cooperation with party auxiliary 13 bodies. 14 5. There shall be no proxies at a congressional district 15 convention. 16